Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.197

Service credit for paid leave of absence—Application to elected officials of labor organizations.

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided under the provisions of RCW 41.26.080 through 41.26.3903.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

[ 1993 c 95 s 3.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—Effective date—1993 c 95: See notes following RCW 41.40.175.